Missouri, session 2026, SB1216.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 306.220, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 306.220,
to read as follows:
306.220. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and referred to as "Hannah's Law".
2. Each person under the age of [seven] twelve who is
on board any watercraft which is on the waters of this state
or who is wading or swimming in navigable public waters more
than three feet in depth shall wear a personal flotation
device which is approved by the United States Coast Guard.
Any person who allows a person under the age of [seven]
twelve to be on board any watercraft which is on the waters
of this state without wearing a personal flotation device,
or to wade or swim in navigable public waters more than
three feet in depth without wearing a personal flotation
device, shall be deemed guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
This section does not apply when the person under the age of
[seven] twelve is in a part of a watercraft which is fully
enclosed, where such enclosure will prevent such person from
falling out of or being thrown from the watercraft. This
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1216 2
section does not apply when a person under the age of twelve
is supervised by a lifeguard.
✓